Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.049

Persons who present likelihood of serious harm—Possession rights.

(1) When a designated crisis responder files a petition for initial detention under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 on the grounds that the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, the petition shall include a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard or comparable information such as their name, address, and date of birth. If the person is not subsequently committed for involuntary treatment under RCW 71.05.240, the court shall forward within three business days of the probable cause hearing a copy of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, along with the date of release from the facility, to the department of licensing, the criminal division of the county prosecutor in the county in which the petition was filed, and the Washington state patrol firearms background check program, which shall forward the information to the national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159). Upon expiration of the six-month period during which the person's right to possess a firearm is suspended as provided in RCW 71.05.182, the Washington state patrol firearms background check program must remove the person from the national instant criminal background check system.

(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the detained person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority, which, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately suspend the license for a period of six months from the date of the person's release from the facility.

(3) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm by reason of having been detained under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 may, upon discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to possess a firearm restored before the six-month suspension period has elapsed by following the procedures provided in RCW 9.41.047(3).

[ 2024 c 290 s 2; 2024 c 289 s 2; 2020 c 302 s 61; 2019 c 247 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 289 s 2 and by 2024 c 290 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2024 c 289: See note following RCW 9.41.111.